ja: 洗浄の目的: 布・生地; リフレッシュ; ステイン; その他
hu: Tisztítás célja: Szövet; Öblítő; Folttisztítás; Egyéb
bg-BG: Предназначение на почистване: Плат; Освежаване; Петна; Други
it: Tipo di pulizia: Tessuto; Rinfrescante; Macchie; Altro
sk-SK: Účel čistenia: Tkanina; Osviežujúci; Škvrny; Iné
zh-CN: 清洁目的: 面料/布料; 清爽; 染料; 其他
ru: Назначение моющего средства: Ткань; Освежающий; Пятна; Другое
sl-SI: Namen čiščenja: Tkanina; Osvežujoče; Madeži; Drugo
en: Cleaning purpose: Fabric; Refreshing; Stains; Other
cs: Účel použití: Látky; Osvěžení; Mořidla; Jiné
el: Σκοπός καθαρισμού: Ύφασμα; Φρεσκάρισμα; Λεκέδες; Άλλο
ko: 청소 목적: 패브릭; 리프레시; 착색제; 기타
th: วัตถุประสงค์ในการทำความสะอาด: ผ้า; ให้ความสดชื่น; สีย้อม; อื่นๆ
vi: Mục đích làm sạch: Vải; Làm mới; Thuốc nhuộm; Khác
es: Uso en limpieza: Tejido; Refrescante; Manchas; Otros
nl: Reinigingsdoel: Stof; Verfrissend; Vlekken; Andere
de: Reinigungszweck: Stoff; Erfrischend; Flecken; Sonstiges
nb: Rengjøringsformål: Stoff; Forfriskende; Flekker; Annet
zh-TW: 清潔目的: 布料; 清爽; 著色劑; 其他
ro-RO: Destinație de utilizare produs de curățare: Textile; Împrospătare; Pete; Altele
da: Rengøringsformål: Stof; Opfriskning; Pletter; Andet
fi: Puhdistuksen tarkoitus: Kangas; Virkistys; Kuultomaalit; Muu
tr: Temizlik amacı: Kumaşlar; Ferahlatıcı; Koyulaştırıcılar; Diğer
hr-HR: Svrha proizvoda za čišćenje: Tkanina; Osvježavanje; Mrlje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Objetivo de limpeza: Tecido; Refrescante; Manchas; Outro
pt-PT: Finalidade de limpeza: Tecido; Refrescante; Corantes; Outro
pl: Przeznaczenie do czyszczenia: Tkanina; Odświeżanie; Plamy; Inne
lt-LT: Valymo priemonės paskirtis: Audinys; Suteikiantis gaivumo; Dėmėms; Kita
sv: Rengöringssyfte: Tyg; Uppfriskande; Fläckar; Övrigt
fr: Objectif du nettoyage: Tissu; Rafraîchissant; Teintures; Autre